Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,142
Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by an order or decision of the director may appeal such order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 179.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.